Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.370

Running start program—Postsecondary credit.

Any state institution of higher education may award postsecondary credit for college-level academic and vocational courses successfully completed by a student while in high school and taken at an institution of higher education. The state institution of higher education shall not charge a fee for the award of the credits.

[ 1994 c 205 s 8; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 408.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.